District of Columbia statutes.
42-4063

Repealed

Conciliation and arbitration service

Repealed.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 905, 32 DCR 3089
1981 Ed., §§ 45-1561 to 45-1563.
Repeal of subchapter: Section 905 of D.C. Act 6-10, effective July 17, 1985, provided that the provisions of subchapter V are repealed.